Utah, session 2026, SB183.
Section 1. Section 53-25-1201 is enacted to read:12. Law Enforcement Prohibitions53-25-1201. Definitions.Reserved.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53-25-1202 is enacted to read:53-25-1202. Law enforcement officer prohibition on tampering with a private surveillance camera -- Exceptions.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2) or (4), a law enforcement officer, or an individual acting on behalf of a law enforcement officer, may not tamper with, change the viewing direction of, or disable a person's surveillance camera that is on the person's private property.(2)Subsection (1) does not apply if the law enforcement officer, or the individual acting on behalf of a law enforcement officer:(a)obtains the person's permission before taking the action described in Subsection (1);(b)obtains a court order granting permission to take the action described in Subsection (1) before taking the action described in Subsection (1); or(c)takes the action described in Subsection (1) under a circumstance described in Subsection (3)(a) if the law enforcement officer, or the individual acting on behalf of a law enforcement officer, subsequently takes an action described in Subsection (3)(b).(3)(a)The circumstances described in Subsection (2)(c) are:(i)the existence of exigent circumstances; or(ii)to protect a law enforcement officer's safety:(A)while executing a warrant; or(B)if the circumstances, as known to the law enforcement officer, present a real, articulable risk to the law enforcement officer's safety.(b)The subsequent actions described in Subsection (2)(c) are:(i)notifying the affected person within 24 hours after:(A)the exigent circumstances no longer exist;(B)the warrant described in Subsection (3)(a)(ii)(A) has been served; or(C)the circumstances described in Subsection (3)(a)(ii)(B) have been resolved; or(ii)obtaining a court order as soon as practicable after the circumstance described in Subsection (3)(a) no longer exists, and if a court refuses to issue a court order, informing the person about the action taken on the surveillance camera within 24 hours after the court's refusal.(4)This section does not apply to a camera that is used for the surveillance or taking of wildlife.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.